incubator/apertium-pl-sk/apertium-pl-sk.pl.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaÁáÄäBbCcČčDdĎďEeÉéFfGgHhIiÍíJjKkLlĽľĹĺMmNnŇňOoÓóÔôPpQqRrŔŕSsŠšTtŤťUuÚúVvWwXxYyÝýZzŽžĄąĆćĘęŁłŃńÓóŚśQqŻżŹź</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="perf"/>
    <sdef n="imperf"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="fut"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mp"/>
    <sdef n="ma"/>
    <sdef n="mi"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="nm"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="hyd"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="ins"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="indecl"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="cpd"/>
    <sdef n="po"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="ppr"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>„</l>
          <r>„<s n="lquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>“</l>
          <r>“<s n="rquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aposchar">
      <e>
        <i>'</i>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’</l>
          <r>'</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <par n="aposchar"/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cześć__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="ij"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="że__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="by__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>m</l>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/><j/>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ś</l>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/><j/>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>śmy</l>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/><j/>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ście</l>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/><j/>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="preto__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gdzie__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gdzie__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="co__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tu__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jej__det">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Britney__np">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/to__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>to</l>
          <r>to<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogo</l>
          <r>to<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omu</l>
          <r>to<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogo</l>
          <r>to<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>to<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>to<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/o__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zego</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zemu</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zym</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zym</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nik/t__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogo</l>
          <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omu</l>
          <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogo</l>
          <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="że"><i>że</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="aż"><i>aż</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="by"><i>by</i><par n="by__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="aby"><i>aby</i><par n="by__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="żeby"><i>żeby</i><par n="by__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ale"><i>ale</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="oraz"><i>oraz</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="albo"><i>albo</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="czy"><i>czy</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jej"><i>jej</i><par n="jej__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jego"><i>jego</i><par n="jej__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ich"><i>ich</i><par n="jej__det"/></e>
    <e lm="cześć"><i>cześć</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aha"><i>aha</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobranoc"><i>dobranoc</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="gdzie"><i>gdzie</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jak"><i>jak</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kiedy"><i>kiedy</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="czy"><i>czy</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Britney"><i>Britney</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lynne"><i>Lynne</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lynn"><i>Lynn</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irene"><i>Irene</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mary"><i>Mary</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Keri"><i>Keri</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jamie"><i>Jamie</i><par n="Britney__np"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
    <e lm="and"><i>and</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="this"><i>this</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="cite"><i>cite</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="br"><i>br</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="image"><i>image</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ref"><i>ref</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nbsp"><i>nbsp</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
